Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2701.36
Seller, defined.

Seller includes every person engaged in the business of selling, leasing, or renting property of a kind the gross receipts from the retail sale, lease, or rental of which are required to be included in the measure of the sales tax.

Laws 1992, LB 871, § 19;

Laws 1993, LB 345, § 27;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 77-2702.18;

Laws 2003, LB 282, § 40.